California, session 20252026, AB614.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 911.2 of the Government Code is amended to read:911.2. (a) A Unless otherwise specified by law, a claim relating to any cause of action shall be presented as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 915) not later than one year after the accrual of the cause of action.(b) For purposes of determining whether a claim was commenced within the period provided by law, the date the claim was presented to the Department of General Services is one of the following:(1) The date the claim is submitted with a twenty-five dollar ($25) filing fee.(2) If a fee waiver is granted, the date the claim was submitted with the affidavit requesting the fee waiver.(3) If a fee waiver is denied, the date the claim was submitted with the affidavit requesting the fee waiver, provided the filing fee is paid to the department within 10 calendar days of the mailing of the notice of the denial of the fee waiver.